vi: Độ phồng của bông nhồi: Độ phồng cực cao; Độ phồng cao; Độ phồng thấp; Độ phồng trung bình; Khác
nb: Batting og fylling loftsnivå: Ekstra høyt volum; Høyt volum; Lavt volum; Middels volum; Annet
fr: Niveau de gonflant du molleton et du rembourrage: Gonflant extra haut; Gonflant haut; Gonflant bas; Gonflant moyen; Autre
it: Imbottitura e Loft Livello soppalco: Spessore extra alto; Spessore alto; Spessore basso; Spessore medio; Altro
hr-HR: Visina vate i punjenja: Ekstra visoka debljina; Visoka debljina; Niska debljina; Srednja debljina; Ostalo
ro-RO: Nivel de rezistență pentru vată și umplutură: Volum foarte mare; Volum mare; Volum mic; Volum mediu; Altele
en: Batting & stuffing loft level: Extra high loft; High loft; Low loft; Medium loft; Other
ja: 詰め物と中綿Loftレベル: エクストラハイロフト; ハイロフト; ローロフト; ミディアムロフト; その他
ko: 충전솜/충전재 두께 레벨: 엑스트라 하이 로프트; 하이 로프트; 로 로프트; 미디엄 로프트; 기타
da: Niveau for fyld og udstopning: Ekstra høj fylde; Høj fylde; Lav fylde; Medium fylde; Andet
tr: Dolgu malzemesi kabarıklık seviyesi: Ekstra yüksek dolgunluk; Yüksek dolgunluk; Düşük dolgunluk; Orta dolgunluk; Diğer
nl: Vulling en wattine loftniveau: Extra hoge loft; Hoge loft; Lage loft; Gemiddelde loft; Overig
ru: Уровень пушистости наполнителя: Экстра-высокий объем; Высокий объем; Низкий объем; Средний объем; Другое
pt-BR: Nível de elevação do enchimento e do acolchoamento: Espessura extra alta; Espessura alta; Espessura baixa; Espessura média; Outros
cs: Výška a nadýchanost výplňového materiálu: Extra vysoký loft; Vysoký loft; Nízký loft; Střední loft; Jiné
th: ระดับความฟูของวัสดุยัดไส้และวัสดุอัด: ความฟูสูงพิเศษ; ความฟูสูง; ความฟูต่ำ; ความฟูปานกลาง; อื่นๆ
el: Επίπεδο πάχους και όγκου βάτας και γεμίσματος: Πολύ μεγάλο πάχος; Μεγάλο πάχος; Μικρό πάχος; Μεσαίο πάχος; Άλλο
pt-PT: Rebatida e enchimento ao nível do loft: Volume extra alto; Volume alto; Volume baixo; Volume médio; Outro
bg-BG: Ниво на пухкавост/обем на пълнежа (ватирането): Много голям обем; Голям обем; Малък обем; Среден обем; Друго
pl: Poziom puszystości watoliny i wypełnienia: Bardzo wysoka puszystość; Wysoka puszystość; Niska puszystość; Średnia puszystość; Inne
sv: Vaddering och fyllning loftnivå: Extra hög fyllighet; Hög fyllighet; Låg fyllighet; Medelhög fyllighet; Övrigt
zh-TW: 棉絮填充物蓬鬆度等級: 特高蓬鬆度; 高蓬鬆度; 低蓬鬆度; 中蓬鬆度; 其他
hu: Vattázás és párnázás magassága: Extra vastag; Vastag; Vékony; Közepesen vastag; Egyéb
es: Nivel de volumen de la guata y el relleno: Volumen extra alto; Volumen alto; Volumen bajo; Volumen medio; Otro
lt-LT: Kamšalo ir užpildo purumo lygis: Ypač didelis purumas; Didelis purumas; Mažas purumas; Vidutinis purumas; Kita
fi: Vanun ja täytteen ilmavuustaso: Erittäin paksu; Paksu; Ohut; Keskipaksu; Muu
zh-CN: 棉絮与填充物蓬松度: 超高蓬松度; 高蓬松度; 低蓬松度; 中等蓬松度; 其他
sk-SK: Tlmenie a vypchávky, úroveň Loft: Extra vysoký objem; Vysoký objem; Nízky objem; Stredný objem; Iné
sl-SI: Stopnja polnila in vate: Izjemna voluminoznost; Visoka voluminoznost; Nizka voluminoznost; Srednja voluminoznost; Drugo
de: Loft-Stufe von Wattierung und Füllmaterial: Extra hohes Volumen; Hohes Volumen; Geringes Volumen; Mittleres Volumen; Sonstige